Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="aC/__v">
<e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>anwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>

    <!-- with light verb "jA" -->
<e><p><l>iyAe</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAAnwu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAe</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAAnwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAAnwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCa</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiCanwi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiCi"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igali</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igalu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igalu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igala</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igala</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igale</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igalA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igale</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>igale</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:galA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWili</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWilu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWilu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWila</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWila</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWilA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAuWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAuWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWili</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWilu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWilu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWila</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWila</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWilA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyAiWile</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yAiWilA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyibi</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyibu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyibu</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyiba</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyiba</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyibe</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyiba</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>iyibe</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yiba"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="aC"><i>aC</i><par n="aC/__v"/></e>
